Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2736
Appeal; procedural dismissal; effect.

If an appeal is dismissed for procedural reasons, the clerk of the district court shall certify the order without cost to the county court. Thereafter the proceedings in the county court shall continue as if no appeal had been taken.

Laws 1981, LB 42, § 9;

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 26;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-541.09.